Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 178. Orders Against Stalking or Sexual Assault

§ 5131.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Course of conduct” means two or more acts over a period of time, however short, in which a person follows, monitors, surveils, threatens, or makes threats about another person, or interferes with another person’s property. This definition shall apply to acts conducted by the person directly or indirectly, and by any action, method, device, or means. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”
(1) (A) “Course of conduct” means two or more acts over a period of time, however short, in which a person follows, monitors, surveils, threatens, or makes threats about another person, or interferes with another person’s property. This definition shall apply to acts conducted by the person directly or indirectly, and by any action, method, device, or means. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”

As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1), threaten shall not be construed to require an express or overt threat.

[Repealed.]

“Nonphysical contact” includes telephone calls, mail, e-mail, social media commentary or comment, or other electronic communication, fax, and written notes.

“Reasonable person” means a reasonable person in the victim’s circumstances.

“Sexually assaulted the plaintiff” means that the defendant engaged in conduct that meets elements of lewd and lascivious conduct as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2601

, lewd and lascivious conduct with a child as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2602

, sexual assault as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 3252

, aggravated sexual assault as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 3253

, use of a child in a sexual performance as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2822

, or consenting to a sexual performance as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2823

, and that the plaintiff was the victim of the offense.

“Stalk” means to engage purposefully in a course of conduct directed at a specific person that the person engaging in the conduct knows or should know would cause a reasonable person to:

fear for his or her safety or the safety of a family member; or

suffer substantial emotional distress as evidenced by:

a fear of unlawful sexual conduct, unlawful restraint, bodily injury, or death; or

significant modifications in the person’s actions or routines, including moving from an established residence, changes to established daily routes to and from work that cause a serious disruption in the person’s life, changes to the person’s employment or work schedule, or the loss of a job or time from work.

“Stay away” means to refrain from knowingly:

initiating or maintaining a physical presence near the plaintiff;

engaging in nonphysical contact with the plaintiff directly or indirectly; or

engaging in nonphysical contact with the plaintiff through third parties who may or may not know of the order.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2006; amended

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2015, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5132.
Jurisdiction and venue.

The Superior Court shall have jurisdiction over proceedings under this chapter.

Proceedings under this chapter may be commenced in the county in which the plaintiff resides. If the plaintiff has left his or her residence to avoid being stalked or sexually assaulted, the plaintiff shall have the option to bring an action in the county of the previous residence or the county of the new residence.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2006.

§ 5133.
Requests for an order against stalking or sexual assault.

A person, other than a family or household member as defined in

15 V.S.A. § 1101(2)

, may seek an order against stalking or sexual assault on behalf of himself or herself or his or her children by filing a complaint under this chapter. A minor 16 years of age or older may file a complaint under this chapter seeking relief on his or her own behalf. The plaintiff shall submit an affidavit in support of the order.

Except as provided in section 5134 of this title, the court shall grant the order only after notice to the defendant and a hearing. The plaintiff shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant stalked or sexually assaulted the plaintiff.

In a hearing under this chapter, neither opinion evidence of nor evidence of the reputation of the plaintiff’s sexual conduct shall be admitted. Evidence of prior sexual conduct of the plaintiff shall not be admitted; provided, however, where it bears on the credibility of the plaintiff or it is material to a fact at issue and its probative value outweighs its private character, the court may admit any of the following:

evidence of the plaintiff’s past sexual conduct with the defendant;

evidence of specific instances of the plaintiff’s sexual conduct showing the source of origin of semen, pregnancy, or disease; or

evidence of specific instances of the plaintiff’s past false allegations of violations of 13 V.S.A. chapter 59 or 72.

If the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that the defendant has stalked or sexually assaulted the plaintiff, or has been convicted of stalking or sexually assaulting the plaintiff, the court shall order the defendant to stay away from the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s children, or both, and may make any other order it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s children, or both.

Relief shall be granted for a fixed period, at the expiration of which time the court may extend any order, upon motion of the plaintiff, for such additional time as it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s children, or both. It is not necessary for the court to find that the defendant stalked or sexually assaulted the plaintiff during the pendency of the order to extend the terms of the order. The court may modify its order at any subsequent time upon motion by either party and a showing of a substantial change in circumstance.

No filing fee shall be required.

Every order under this chapter shall contain the name of the court, the names of the parties, the date of the petition, and the date and time of the order and shall be signed by the judge.

Form complaints and form orders for an “Order Against Stalking or Sexual Assault” shall be provided by the Court Administrator and shall be maintained by the clerks of the courts.

When findings are required under this section, the court shall make either written findings of fact or oral findings of fact on the record.

Every final order issued under this section shall bear the following language: “VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER IS A CRIME SUBJECT TO A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OR A FINE, OR BOTH, AND MAY ALSO BE PROSECUTED AS CRIMINAL CONTEMPT PUNISHABLE BY FINE OR IMPRISONMENT, OR BOTH.”

Affidavit forms required pursuant to this section shall bear the following language: “MAKING FALSE STATEMENTS IN THIS AFFIDAVIT IS A CRIME SUBJECT TO A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OR A FINE, OR BOTH, AS PROVIDED BY

13 V.S.A. § 2904

.”

A finding by the court pursuant to this chapter that the defendant stalked or sexually assaulted the plaintiff shall not be admissible in any subsequent civil proceedings for the purpose of establishing liability.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2006; amended

2015, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

Parties.

Because the statute governing requests for orders against stalking or sexual assault (SSA) does not require defendants in SSA protection-order cases to be adults, the trial court erred in reading such a limitation into the statute and thereby dismissing a complaint for an order of protection brought by a 17-year-old against a 13-year-old without reaching the merits. T.C. v. L.D., 2020 VT 19, 211 Vt. 582, 229 A.3d 77, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 18 (2020).

§ 5134.
Emergency relief.

In accordance with the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, a person other than a family or household member as defined in

15 V.S.A. § 1101(2)

may file a complaint for a temporary order against stalking or sexual assault. Such complaint shall be filed during regular court hours. The plaintiff shall submit an affidavit in support of the order. The court may issue a temporary order under this chapter ex parte, without notice to the defendant, upon motion and findings by the court that the defendant has stalked or sexually assaulted the plaintiff. The court may order the defendant to stay away from the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s children, or both, and may make any other such order it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s children, or both.

Every order issued under this section shall contain the name of the court, the names of the parties, the date of the petition, and the date and time of the order and shall be signed by the judge. Every order issued under this section shall state upon its face a date, time, and place that the defendant may appear to petition the court for modification or discharge of the order. This opportunity to contest shall be scheduled as soon as reasonably possible, which in no event shall be more than 14 days from the date of issuance of the order. At such hearings, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant stalked or sexually assaulted the plaintiff. If the court finds that the plaintiff has met his or her burden, it shall continue the order in effect and make such other orders as it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s children, or both.

Form complaints and form orders shall be provided by the Court Administrator and shall be maintained by the clerks of the courts.

Every order issued under this chapter shall bear the following language: “VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER IS A CRIME SUBJECT TO A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OR A FINE, OR BOTH, AND MAY ALSO BE PROSECUTED AS CRIMINAL CONTEMPT PUNISHABLE BY FINE OR IMPRISONMENT, OR BOTH.”

Affidavit forms required pursuant to this section shall bear the following language: “MAKING FALSE STATEMENTS IN THIS AFFIDAVIT IS A CRIME SUBJECT TO A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OR A FINE, OR BOTH, AS PROVIDED BY

13 V.S.A. § 2904

.”

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2006; amended

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2017, No. 11

, § 23.

§ 5135.
Service.

A complaint or ex parte temporary order or final order issued under this chapter shall be served in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure and may be served by any law enforcement officer. A court that issues an order under this chapter during court hours shall promptly transmit the order electronically or by other means to a law enforcement agency for service.

A defendant who attends a hearing held under section 5133 or 5134 of this title at which a temporary or final order under this chapter is issued and who receives notice from the court on the record that the order has been issued shall be deemed to have been served. A defendant notified by the court on the record shall be required to adhere immediately to the provisions of the order. However, even when the court has previously notified the defendant of the order, the court shall transmit the order for additional service by a law enforcement agency.

Orders against stalking or sexual assault shall be served by the law enforcement agency at the earliest possible time and shall take precedence over other summonses and orders, with the exception of abuse prevention orders issued pursuant to 15 V.S.A. chapter 21. Orders shall be served in a manner calculated to ensure the safety of the plaintiff. Methods of service which include advance notification to the defendant shall not be used. The person making service shall file a return of service with the court stating the date, time, and place that the order was delivered personally to the defendant.

If service of a notice of hearing issued under section 5133 or 5134 of this title cannot be made before the scheduled hearing, the court shall continue the hearing and extend the terms of the order upon request of the plaintiff for such additional time as it deems necessary to achieve service on the defendant.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2006; amended

2013, No. 17

, § 3;

2013, No. 17

, § 4, eff. Nov. 1, 2013.

§ 5136.
Procedure.

Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, proceedings commenced under this chapter shall be in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure and shall be in addition to any other available civil or criminal remedies.

The Court Administrator is authorized to contract with public or private agencies to assist plaintiffs to seek relief and to gain access to Superior Court. Law enforcement agencies shall assist in carrying out the intent of this section.

The Office of the Court Administrator shall ensure that the Superior Court has procedures in place so that the contents of orders and pendency of other proceedings can be known to all courts for cases in which an order against stalking or sexual assault proceeding is related to a criminal proceeding.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, an order issued pursuant to sections 5133 and 5134 of this title shall not be stayed pending an appeal.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2006; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 82;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2013, No. 17

, § 7.

§ 5137.
Filing orders with law enforcement personnel; Department of Public Safety protection order database.

Police departments, sheriff’s departments, and State Police district offices shall establish procedures for filing notice against stalking or sexual assault orders issued under this chapter and for making their personnel aware of the existence and contents of such orders.

Any court in this State that issues a notice against a stalking or sexual assault order under this chapter shall transmit a copy of the order to the Department of Public Safety’s protection order database.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2006.

§ 5138.
Enforcement.

Law enforcement officers are authorized to enforce orders issued under this chapter. A foreign abuse prevention order as defined in

15 V.S.A. § 1101

shall be accorded full faith and credit throughout this State and shall be enforced as if it were an order of this State. Law enforcement officers may rely upon a copy of any order issued under this chapter or any foreign abuse prevention order. Enforcement may include making an arrest in accordance with the provisions of Rule 3 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure.

In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, violation of an order issued under this chapter may be prosecuted as criminal contempt under Rule 42 of Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure. The prosecution for criminal contempt may be initiated by the State’s Attorney in the Criminal or Civil Division of the Superior Court in the unit or county in which the violation occurred. The maximum penalty which may be imposed under this subsection shall be a fine of $1,000.00 or imprisonment for six months, or both. A sentence of imprisonment upon conviction for criminal contempt may be stayed in the discretion of the court, pending the expiration of the time allowed for filing notice of appeal or pending appeal if any appeal is taken. After two years have passed from conviction under this subsection, the court may on motion of the defendant expunge the record of the criminal proceeding and conviction unless the defendant has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or a violation of a protection order after such initial adjudication.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2006.